test/src/gt-norm-yamls/olo-test_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - päivy: # Noun 'day / päivä' - full paradigm
     nado+N+Sg+Nom: nado
     nado+N+Sg+Gen: nadon
     nado+N+Sg+Acc: [nado, nadon]
     nado+N+Sg+Part: nadod
     nado+N+Sg+Tra: nadoks
     nado+N+Sg+Abe: nadota
     nado+N+Sg+Com: nadonke
     nado+N+Sg+Ine: nados
     nado+N+Sg+Ela: nadospäi
     nado+N+Sg+Ill: nadoho
     nado+N+Sg+Ade: nadol
     nado+N+Sg+Abl: nadolpäi
     nado+N+Sg+All: nadole
     nado+N+Sg+EssInst: nadon
     nado+N+Sg+Prl: nadodme
     nado+N+Sg+Apr1: nadonno
     nado+N+Sg+Apr2: nadonnoks
     nado+N+Sg+Egr: nadonnopäi
     nado+N+Sg+Ter1: nadohosai
     nado+N+Sg+Ter2: nadolesai
     nado+N+Sg+Ter3: nadossai
     nado+N+Sg+Add1: nadohopäi
     nado+N+Sg+Add2: nadolepäi

     nado+N+Pl+Nom: nadod
     nado+N+Pl+Gen: [nadoid'en, nadoiden]
     nado+N+Pl+Acc: nadod
     nado+N+Pl+Part: nadoid
     nado+N+Pl+Tra: nadoikš
     nado+N+Pl+Abe: nadoita
     nado+N+Pl+Com: nadoidenke
     nado+N+Pl+Ine: nadoiš
     nado+N+Pl+Ela: nadoišpäi
     nado+N+Pl+Ill: nadoihe
     nado+N+Pl+Ade: nadoil
     nado+N+Pl+Abl: nadoilpäi
     nado+N+Pl+All: nadoile
     nado+N+Pl+EssInst: nadoin
     nado+N+Pl+Prl: nadoidme
     nado+N+Pl+Apr1: nadoidenno
     nado+N+Pl+Apr2: nadoidennoks
     nado+N+Pl+Egr: nadoidennopäi
     nado+N+Pl+Ter1: nadoihesai
     nado+N+Pl+Ter2: nadoilesai
     nado+N+Pl+Add1: nadoihepäi
     nado+N+Pl+Add2: nadoilepäi

     nado+N+Sg+Nom+Clt: nadoki
     nado+N+Sg+Gen+Clt: nadonki
     nado+N+Sg+Acc+Clt: [nadoki, nadonki]
     nado+N+Sg+Part+Clt: nadodki
     nado+N+Sg+Tra+Clt: nadokski
     nado+N+Sg+Abe+Clt: nadotaki
     nado+N+Sg+Com+Clt: nadonkeki
     nado+N+Sg+Ine+Clt: nadoski
     nado+N+Sg+Ela+Clt: nadospäiki
     nado+N+Sg+Ill+Clt: nadohoki
     nado+N+Sg+Ade+Clt: nadolki
     nado+N+Sg+Abl+Clt: nadolpäiki
     nado+N+Sg+All+Clt: nadoleki
     nado+N+Sg+EssInst+Clt: nadonki
     nado+N+Sg+Prl+Clt: nadodmeki
     nado+N+Sg+Apr1+Clt: nadonnoki
     nado+N+Sg+Apr2+Clt: nadonnokski
     nado+N+Sg+Egr+Clt: nadonnopäiki
     nado+N+Sg+Ter1+Clt: nadohosaiki
     nado+N+Sg+Ter2+Clt: nadolesaiki
     nado+N+Sg+Ter3+Clt: nadossaiki
     nado+N+Sg+Add1+Clt: nadohopäiki
     nado+N+Sg+Add2+Clt: nadolepäiki

     nado+N+Pl+Nom+Clt: nadodki
     nado+N+Pl+Gen+Clt: [nadoid'enki, nadoidenki]
     nado+N+Pl+Acc+Clt: nadodki
     nado+N+Pl+Part+Clt: nadoidki
     nado+N+Pl+Tra+Clt: nadoikški
     nado+N+Pl+Abe+Clt: nadoitaki
     nado+N+Pl+Com+Clt: nadoidenkeki
     nado+N+Pl+Ine+Clt: nadoiški
     nado+N+Pl+Ela+Clt: nadoišpäiki
     nado+N+Pl+Ill+Clt: nadoiheki
     nado+N+Pl+Ade+Clt: nadoilki
     nado+N+Pl+Abl+Clt: nadoilpäiki
     nado+N+Pl+All+Clt: nadoileki
     nado+N+Pl+EssInst+Clt: nadoinki
     nado+N+Pl+Prl+Clt: nadoidmeki
     nado+N+Pl+Apr1+Clt: nadoidennoki
     nado+N+Pl+Apr2+Clt: nadoidennokski
     nado+N+Pl+Egr+Clt: nadoidennopäiki
     nado+N+Pl+Ter1+Clt: nadoihesaiki
     nado+N+Pl+Ter2+Clt: nadoilesaiki
     nado+N+Pl+Add1+Clt: nadoihepäiki
     nado+N+Pl+Add2+Clt: nadoilepäiki
  
